District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.28

Repealed

Nonresidents; unlicensed drivers; unregistered vehicles; accidents in other states.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 128, ch. 222, § 28
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-428.
1973 Ed., § 40-444.